Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201981-5,226
State elevator inspector; records required.

The state elevator inspector shall maintain a complete and accurate record of the name of the owner or user of each conveyance subject to sections 81-5,222 and 81-5,223 and a full description of the conveyance and the date when last inspected.

Laws 2006, LB 489, § 17;

R.S.1943, (2010), § 48-2517;

Laws 2019, LB301, § 62.